Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-920
Powers; duties; liabilities.

When a district has been organized under the provisions of sections 12-909 to 12-921, it shall have all the powers and duties and be subject to all the liabilities and restrictions incident to cemetery associations organized under Chapter 12, article 5, and amendments thereto, except as changed, enlarged or restricted by the provisions of sections 12-909 to 12-921.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 12, p. 142.